Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6. A. Except as may be otherwise provided, no person
holding an office under the laws of the state and no deputy of any
officer so holding any office shall, during the person’s term of
office, hold any other office or be the deputy of any officer
holding any office, under the laws of the state. The provisions of
this section shall not apply to:
1. Notaries public;
2. Members of the State Textbook Committee;
3. County free fair board members;
4. Municipal and county law enforcement officers serving in
positions as law enforcement officers of both such governmental
entities upon such terms and conditions as are mutually approved by

resolutions adopted by the board of county commissioners and
governing body of the municipality employing such officers;
5. Any person holding a county or municipal office or position,
or membership on any public trust authority, who is a member of a
board or commission that relates to federal, state, county, or
municipal government and is created by the United States government,
the State of Oklahoma this state or a political subdivision of the
this state, except where the duties of the offices or positions
conflict;
6. Any elected municipal officers and school board members who
are appointed to a state board, commission, or similar entity if
there is no compensation for such services other than reimbursement
for necessary travel expenses pursuant to the provisions of the
State Travel Reimbursement Act;
7. Any trustee of a public trust, who is appointed as a trustee
of a different public trust or any trustee of the Tulsa County
Public Facilities Authority who may also be employed by the
Department of Transportation;
8. Law enforcement officers employed by municipal or county law
enforcement departments or agencies, other than those law
enforcement officers elected or appointed as sheriff, chief of
police, or some similar position in which they are the head of a
county or municipal law enforcement agency, who are elected to local
boards of education; provided, the provisions of this paragraph
shall not prohibit any law enforcement officer employed by a
municipality having a population of ten thousand (10,000) or fewer
people from serving as a member of a local board of education;
9. Any member of the Oklahoma Highway Patrol Division of the
Department of Public Safety who is elected to a local board of
education;
10. Any employee of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
who is elected to a local board of education;
11. Any District Supervisor, Assistant District Supervisor,
Team Supervisor, Parole Officer 1, or Parole Officer 2 of the
Department of Corrections who is elected or appointed to a city
council;
ENR. H. B. NO. 2083 Page 2

12. Any trustee or director of a rural electric cooperative, or
port authority who is appointed or elected to a state, county, or
municipal board, commission, or similar entity;
13. County employees who are elected as members of town or city
councils;
14. Municipal, county, state, or tribal law enforcement or
peace officers operating under cross-deputization agreements with an
Indian tribe or branch of the federal government;
15. Municipal or county law enforcement or peace officers
serving in positions as campus police officers or campus public
safety officers pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Campus
Security Act, upon such terms and conditions as are mutually
approved by resolution adopted by the governing body of the
municipality or county and the governing board of the institution of
higher education;
16. State law enforcement or peace officers serving in
positions as campus police officers or campus public safety officers
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Campus Security Act, upon
such terms and conditions as are mutually approved by written
agreement between the Commissioner of Public Safety and the
governing board of the institution of higher education;
17. Municipal, county, and state law enforcement officers
serving in positions as part-time or seasonal rangers or peace
officers under the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department or the
Grand River Dam Authority;
18. Members of the University Hospitals Authority;
19. Any person holding a state or county office or position who
is a reserve force deputy sheriff, or a reserve special agent with
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control
or a reserve municipal police officer;
20. Any person holding a state office or position who serves as
a special assistant district attorney without compensation;
21. Any elected or appointed member of a local school board who
is a member of a municipal planning commission;
ENR. H. B. NO. 2083 Page 3

22. Any elected or appointed member of a local school board who
is a member or an officer of a volunteer fire department;
23. Directors or officers of a rural water district and chiefs
of municipal fire departments or rural fire districts who are
appointed or elected to an unsalaried office in a state, county,
municipal, school, or technology center school board, commission, or
similar entity, except where the duties of the office would create a
conflict of interest;
24. Any person who is a dispatcher or confinement officer at a
municipal or county jail who is a noncompensated reserve municipal
police officer or a reserve deputy sheriff;
25. Any person who is an assistant district attorney serving as
a municipal judge or prosecutor;
26. Any park ranger under the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department or any game warden or reserve game warden employed by the
Department of Wildlife Conservation who is elected or appointed to a
local board of education or to a municipal governing body, board,
commission, or similar entity;
27. Members of the Oklahoma State University Medical Center
Authority, the Oklahoma State University Medical Trust, or the State
Board of Osteopathic Examiners;
28. Any member of the state Legislature or any state officer
who serves on the board of trustees of the Oklahoma School for the
Visual and Performing Arts;
29. Members of the Council on Judicial Complaints;
30. A campus police officer who is elected as a member of the
governing board of a town or municipality that is outside of the
town or municipality where the person serves as a campus police
officer; and
30. 31. Any person who is a state employee but not a member of
the state military forces, including district attorneys, assistant
district attorneys, district court judges, associate district court
judges, and special judges, when detailed as a military trial judge
pursuant to Section 826 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes or when
serving as an appellate military judge pursuant to Section 866 of
Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes when the Military Court of Appeals
ENR. H. B. NO. 2083 Page 4

is convened. The rules of procedure prescribed by the State Judge
Advocate pursuant to subsection L of Section 866 of Title 44 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall define what constitutes the Military Court
of Appeals being “convened” for purposes of this paragraph.
The provisions of this section shall not prohibit any person
holding an office under the laws of the state or any deputy of any
officer so holding any office from serving upon the board of
Oklahoma Futures or upon the board of directors of the Oklahoma
Center for the Advancement of Science and Technology. The
provisions of this section shall not prohibit a member of the board
of directors of the Oklahoma Center for the Advancement of Science
and Technology from serving upon the board of Oklahoma Futures.
B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section,
salaries, emoluments, or benefits that would otherwise be paid by
the agency or political subdivision to a loaned employee or officer
shall instead be paid to the regular employer of such employee. The
loaned employee shall in turn be paid regular salary and benefits
the same as if continuing regular employment with the permanent
employer.
C. Any person excepted pursuant to paragraph 30 31 of
subsection A of this section, when retained as a military trial
judge or when serving as a military appellate judge when the
Military Court of Appeals is convened, shall be entitled to military
judicial leave in accordance with Section 209 of Title 44 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2083 Page 5

Passed the House of Representatives the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2083 Page 6